Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.31.070

Tax levy for fund.

The legislative body of the code city, after the drawing of warrants against the accident fund, shall estimate the amount necessary to pay the warrant with accrued interest thereon and may appropriate and transfer money from the contingency fund sufficient therefor, or if there is not sufficient money in the contingency fund the legislative body shall levy a tax sufficient to pay all or such unpaid portion of any judgment not exceeding seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. If a single levy of seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value is not sufficient, and if other moneys are not available therefor, an annual levy of seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value shall be made until the warrants and interest are fully paid.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 27; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.31.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.